District of Columbia statutes.
15-316

Subrogation of purchaser after defective sale; no refund.

When, upon the sale of property under execution, the title of the purchaser is invalid by reason of a defect in the proceedings, the purchaser may be subrogated to the rights of the creditor against the debtor to the extent of the money paid by him and applied to the debtor’s benefit, and to that extent has a lien on the property sold against all persons except bona fide purchasers without notice; but the creditor may not be required to refund the purchase money on account of the invalidity of the sale.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 15-316.
1973 Ed., § 15-316.

Prior Codifications